Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Article 3. Financial Provisions.

Sec. 35.10.130.
Construction within appropriations and limits imposed by the legislature.

Each public work shall be constructed in a completed manner within the appropriation and limits imposed by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 art V title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.135.
Public facility planning fund.

There is established within the Office of the Governor, office of management and budget a public facility planning fund.
The fund is a capital fund and consists of (1) money appropriated by the legislature, (2) money reimbursed to it from the proceeds of the sales of general obligation bonds and revenue bonds issued for projects and (3) money reimbursed to it from appropriations for any projects for which money from the fund has been spent.
The fund is available for expenditure, on a reimbursable basis, only for the purposes of providing working capital for facility program planning and for facility procurement planning as specified in this chapter.
All expenditures from the fund are subject to an independent audit which shall be made annually and reported to the governor and the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1976; am § 28 ch 63 SLA 1983)

Secs. 35.10.140 — 35.10.150.
Prohibitions and penalties. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]